Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8482, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Duties. (a) A school resource officer's contractual duties with a school district or charter school shall include: (1) fostering a positive school climate through relationship building and open communication; (2) protecting students, staff, and visitors to the school grounds from criminal activity; (3) serving as a liaison from law enforcement to school officials; (4) providing advice on safety drills; (5) identifying vulnerabilities in school facilities and safety protocols; (6) educating and advising students and staff on law enforcement topics; and (7) enforcement of criminal laws. (b) A school district or charter school may contract with a school resource officer's employer for the officer to perform additional duties to those described in paragraph (a). (c) A school resource officer must not use force or the authority of their office solely to enforce school rules or policies or participate in the enforcement of discipline for violations of school rules. new text begin (d) A school resource officer may use force to detain or arrest a student only as a last resort after using all appropriate de-escalation techniques and accounting for the student's age, size, and disabilities, and only as otherwise authorized in law. new text end new text begin (e) To the degree feasible, a school resource officer shall be assigned to one specific school, or to only a limited number of specific schools, and shall not be assigned to multiple schools on a floating basis. To promote communication and trust, an officer shall remain assigned to a school for at least three years if possible. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f) new text end Nothing in this subdivision limits any other duty or responsibility imposed on peace officers; limits the expectation that peace officers will exercise professional judgment and discretion to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of the public when carrying out their duties; or creates a duty for school resource officers to protect students, staff, or others on school grounds that is different from the duty to protect the public as a whole. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8482, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Training course. (a) By January 15, 2025, the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training, in consultation with the Department of Public Safety's School Safety Center, shall prepare learning objectives for training courses to instruct peace officers in serving as a school resource officer. At a minimum, the learning objectives must ensure officers receive training on: (1) the juvenile justice system; (2) legal standards for peace officers to use force to detain or arrest students in schools; (3) legal standards for school employees and contractors to use force to detain, discipline, and arrest students in school; (4) de-escalation techniques and using the least restrictive physical intervention strategies for handling conflicts in schools; (5) responding to persons experiencing a mental health crisis in a school setting, with an emphasis placed on juveniles; (6) understanding and working with students with disabilities and students receiving special education services; (7) juvenile brain development, including limitations on impulse control; (8) the impact of childhood trauma on juvenile behavior; (9) responding to threats of violence against students and schools; (10) detecting juvenile exploitation; (11) investigating crimes committed in schools, including student and parental rights; (12) identifying vulnerabilities in school facilities and safety protocols; (13) mandated safety drills and best practices in conducting safety drills; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (14) the topics identified in section 626.8469, subdivision 1, as they pertain to juveniles or studentsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (15) sexual misconduct awareness relating to avoiding inappropriate conduct and the appearance of impropriety and how best to assist students in reporting instances of sexual misconduct. new text end (b) The Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training may also approve supplemental training courses that are offered by providers who have trained school resource officers in the state prior to development of the learning objectives required under paragraph (a). At a minimum, an approved supplemental course must provide instruction on each of the board's learning objectives that were not covered in the provider's existing school resource officer course curriculum. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8482, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Additional duties of schools. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or charter school that is considering placing a school resource officer in a school, or that has already done so, shall engage broadly with stakeholders from the local community so that students, families of students, teachers and other school staff, and community members are given the opportunity to comment on the potential pros and cons of the use of a school resource officer. new text end new text begin (b) A school district or charter school that uses a school resource officer shall regularly engage in outreach to the stakeholders described in paragraph (a) to solicit feedback on how the program is being implemented and to collectively problem solve to address concerns. To the degree feasible, a school resource officer shall engage with students and their families on school safety and solicit feedback on how to increase school safety. new text end new text begin (c) A school district or charter school that uses a school resource officer shall ensure that school staff are trained in the operations relating to the officer including the officer's role, duties, and expectations. When appropriate, the officer shall be part of this training. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8482, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Additional duties of law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (a) To the degree feasible, a law enforcement agency hiring or selecting a school resource officer shall: new text end new text begin (1) employ a collaborative process that includes the participation of stakeholders such as students, families of students, teachers and other school staff, and community members; new text end new text begin (2) use a hiring process specific to school resource officers that prioritizes qualities tailored to their roles, duties, and expectations; and new text end new text begin (3) select officers who have volunteered for the role, have a minimum of three years' experience, and reflect the community they will serve. new text end new text begin (b) A law enforcement agency employing a school resource officer shall develop and use a system of evaluation and supervision relating to the officer that is specific to school resource officers and that is tailored to the officers' roles, duties, and expectations. new text end new text begin (c) To the degree feasible, a law enforcement agency employing a school resource officer shall provide the officer with sufficient opportunities to interact with peers across the state and nationally through either in-person or virtual meetings and conferences and through participation in professional organizations for school resource officers. new text end new text begin (d) At least once per year, a law enforcement agency employing a school resource officer shall conduct an assessment of the program and the officer's performance to ensure that the expectations of the agency, school, and community are being met. If the assessment identifies concerns or shortcomings, the agency shall meet with the stakeholders described in paragraph (a) to formulate a plan to address the concerns or shortcomings. new text end new text begin (e) A law enforcement agency employing a school resource officer, in collaboration with the school district or charter school, shall develop reporting and tracking systems involving the activities of school resource officers. Subject to chapter 13 and other applicable data practices laws, this information may be shared with the officer's supervisors, partner schools, and other stakeholders. new text end new text begin (f) A law enforcement agency employing a school resource officer shall develop and enforce policies designed to prevent the officer from engaging in sexual misconduct with students. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin PEACE OFFICERS STANDARDS AND TRAINING BOARD; UPDATED LEARNING OBJECTIVES.new text end new text begin By January 1, 2026, the Peace Officers Standards and Training Board shall update the learning objectives described in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8482, subdivision 4, to include the amendments to that provision made in this act. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE; SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER PROGRAM GUIDING PRINCIPLES.new text end new text begin When implementing the duties and responsibilities imposed in this act, school districts, schools, and law enforcement agencies shall be informed by the United States Department of Justice's Guiding Principles for School Resource Officer Programs. School districts, schools, and law enforcement agencies are encouraged to review this document and fully implement its recommendations. new text end